Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 7A. Regenerative and Innovative Agriculture

§ 4961.
Purpose.

The purposes of this subchapter are to:

enhance the economic viability of farms in Vermont;

improve the health and productivity of the soils of Vermont;

encourage farmers to implement regenerative farming practices;

reduce the amount of agricultural waste entering the waters of Vermont;

enhance crop resilience to rainfall fluctuations and mitigate water damage to crops, land, and surrounding infrastructure;

promote cost-effective farming practices;

reinvigorate the rural economy; and

help the next generation of Vermont farmers learn regenerative farming practices so that farming remains integral to the economy, landscape, and culture of Vermont.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 64

, § 11.

§ 4962.
Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Certified Vermont Environmental Steward” means an owner or operator of a farm who has achieved the thresholds for the Vermont Environmental Stewardship Program to be certified as a farm that improves soil health and contributes to improving water quality.

“Regenerative farming” means a series of cropland management practices that:

contributes to generating or building soils and soil fertility and health;

increases water percolation, increases water retention, and increases the amount of clean water running off farms;

increases biodiversity and ecosystem health and resiliency; and

sequesters carbon in agricultural soils.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 64

, § 11.

§ 4963.
Regenerative farming; Vermont Environmental Stewardship Program.

Establishment of Program. There is created within the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets the Vermont Environmental Stewardship Program (VESP) to provide technical and financial assistance to Vermont farmers seeking to implement regenerative farming practices to achieve certification as a Certified Vermont Environmental Steward.

Program standards; application. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall establish by procedure standards for certification as a Certified Environmental Steward. Application for certification shall be made in the manner required by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

Program services. The VESP shall provide the following services to farmers voluntarily seeking to transition to achieve certification as a Certified Vermont Environmental Steward:

information and education regarding the requirements for certification, including the method, timeline, and process of certification;

technical assistance in completing any required application for certification;

technical assistance in developing plans and implementing practices to achieve certification from the VESP; and

technical assistance in complying with the requirements of the VESP after a farm is certified.

Financial assistance; eligibility. An owner or operator of a farm participating in the VESP shall be eligible for financial assistance from existing Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets financial assistance programs for costs incurred in implementing any of the practices required for certification as a Certified Environmental Steward.

Revocation of certification. The Secretary may, after due notice and hearing, revoke a certification issued under this section when the owner or operator of a certified farm fails to comply with the standards for certification established under subsection (b) of this section.

Administrative penalty; falsely advertising. The Secretary may assess an administrative penalty of up to $1,000.00 against the owner or operator of a farm who knowingly advertises as a Certified Environmental Steward when not certified by the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Added

2019, No. 64

, § 11.

§ 4964.
Agricultural Innovation Board.

Creation. There is created the Agricultural Innovation Board that shall:

Review historic recommendations for pesticide reduction in the State and coordinate with existing work groups to avoid submitting to the General Assembly conflicting policy recommendations on the regulation of pesticides and farming.

Recommend practices that reduce the use of and exposure to pesticides and synthetic fertilizers in order to protect soil biology, human health, and environmental health, including recommended targets to achieve the State goal of an overall reduction in the use of pesticides consistent with sound pest or vegetative management practices.

Advise the Executive Branch and the General Assembly with respect to legislation concerning the use of agricultural pest control measures and integrated pest management.

Recommend to the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets policies, proposed rules, or legislation for the regulation of the use of treated articles when the Board determines that use of a treated article will have a hazardous or long-term deleterious effect on the environment in Vermont, presents a likely risk to human health, or is dangerous.

Recommend practices to reduce the use and generation of waste associated with plastic in farming.

Incentivize farming practices that are looking to reduce the use and dependence on pesticides in their practices.

Advise the Agency with regard to the regulation of plant biostimulants.

Recommend studies necessary for the performance of its functions as established under this section.

Explore methods and standards for transitioning farmers to practices that reduce pesticide usage.

Explore methods and standards for farmers to engage in carbon sequestration or mitigation.

Review the seed traits of a new genetically engineered seed proposed for sale, distribution, or use in the State.

Study and issue recommendations regarding the feasibility of the use of biodegradable plastics in agriculture and the promotion of the use of and production of biodegradable plastics and similar products in Vermont.

Organization of the Board.

The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets shall convene the Agricultural Innovation Board. Members of the Board who are not serving in an ex officio capacity shall be appointed by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets, and the Secretary shall designate a chair from among the members of the Board. The Agricultural Innovation Board shall consist of the following 13 members:

the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets or designee;

an active farmer who is a member of an organization representing the organic farming community;

a member from the University of Vermont Center for Sustainable Agriculture;

the Director of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets, Agrichemical Program or designee;

the Director of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets, Water Quality Program or designee;

the Commissioner of Health or a designee with expertise in the effects of pesticides on human health;

the Secretary of Natural Resources or designee;

a certified crop consultant;

an active farmer who is a member of an organization representing the conventional dairy industry in Vermont;

an active farmer who is a member of an organization representing fruit or vegetable farmers in Vermont;

an active farmer who is a member of an organization representing grass-based, non-dairy livestock farming in Vermont;

a soil biologist; and

a member of an environmental organization that advocates for policy regarding the management or reduction of toxic substances in the State.

Members of the Agricultural Innovation Board shall be appointed for terms of three years, except initially, appointments shall be made such that one member shall serve for a term of one year and one for a term of two years. Members other than ex officio members shall be allowed to serve not more than three consecutive terms.

Members of the Agricultural Innovation Board other than ex officio members and those compensated for their participation on the Board shall be entitled to per diem compensation authorized under

32 V.S.A. § 1010(b)

for each day spent in the performance of their duties, and each member shall be reimbursed for his or her actual and necessary expenses incurred in carrying out his or her duties. These payments shall be made from the Pesticide Monitoring Revolving Fund under

6 V.S.A. § 929

.

The Board shall meet no fewer than four times a year.

Powers and duties of the Board. The Agricultural Innovation Board shall:

issue a report annually to the General Assembly on or before January 15 that recommends policy solutions to assist farmers in:

reducing the use of and exposure to pesticides; and

the use of innovative or alternative practices;

propose an annual budget report that provides ideas for funding sources for any new programs recommended in the annual report; and

survey farmers from every county in the State to help better understand how agricultural inputs, such as pesticides, synthetic fertilizers, and plastics, are currently used, as well as current challenges farmers face in reducing these inputs in order to better inform recommendations to be provided in the annual report required under subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Seed review. The Agricultural Innovation Board shall advise the Secretary regarding the sale, distribution, or use of genetically engineered seed in the State and may recommend to the Secretary limits or conditions on the sale, distribution, or use of a genetically engineered seed or seeds or recommend a limited period of time for sale of a genetically engineered seed or seeds.

HISTORY:

Added

2021, No. 49

, § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2022.